Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1560.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COMO PARK ZOO AND CONSERVATORY.new text end new text begin $1,750,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,750,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to Como Park Zoo and Conservatory for educational programs, habitat enhancements, special exhibits, music appreciation programs, and historical garden access and preservation. new text end